Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.410

Provisions applicable to plan 2.

RCW 41.26.420 through 41.26.550 shall apply only to plan 2 members.

[ 1991 c 35 s 29; 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Legislative direction and placement—1977 ex.s. c 294: "Sections 1 through 16 of this 1977 amendatory act shall be added to chapter 41.26 RCW and shall be codified as consecutive sections of the Revised Code of Washington within such chapter." [ 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 25.]

Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 294: "Section headings used in this 1977 amendatory act shall not constitute any part of the law." [ 1977 ex.s. c 294 s 24.]